Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.055

Funds—Appropriation and distribution.

(1) The funds for the learning assistance program shall be appropriated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.260 and the omnibus appropriations act. The distribution formula is for school district allocation purposes only, except as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a)(ii), but all funds appropriated for the learning assistance program must be expended for the purposes of RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065.

(2) A district's high poverty-based allocation is generated by its qualifying schools as defined in RCW 28A.150.260(10) and must be expended by the district for those schools. This funding must supplement and not supplant the district's expenditures under this chapter for those schools.

[ 2018 c 266 s 104; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 405; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 205; 2009 c 548 s 703; 2008 c 321 s 10; 2005 c 489 s 1; 2004 c 20 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Findings—2008 c 321: See note following RCW 28A.320.190.